Utah statutes.
59-2-926.   Proposed tax increase by state -- Notice -- Contents -- Dates.
If the state authorizes a levy pursuant to Section 53A-17a-135 that exceeds
the certified revenue levy as defined in Section 53A-17a-103 or authorizes a
levy pursuant to Section 59-2-1602 that exceeds the certified revenue levy as
defined in Section 59-2-102, the state shall publish a notice no later than 10
days after the last day of the annual legislative general session that meets
the following requirements:
(1) (a)  The Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall advertise that the
state authorized a levy that generates revenue in excess of the previous
year's ad valorem tax revenue, plus new growth, but exclusive of revenue from
collections from redemptions, interest, and penalties:
(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the state; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
(b)  Except an advertisement published on a website, the advertisement
described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  shall be no less than 1/4 page in size and the type used shall be no
smaller than 18 point, and surrounded by a 1/4-inch border:
(ii)  may not be placed in that portion of the newspaper where legal notices
and classified advertisements appear; and
(iii)  shall be run once.
(2)  The form and content of the notice shall be substantially as follows:
"NOTICE OF TAX INCREASE
The state has budgeted an increase in its property tax revenue from
$__________ to $__________ or ____%.  The increase in property tax revenues
will come from the following sources (include all of the following
provisions):
(a)  $__________ of the increase will come from (provide an explanation of the
cause of adjustment or increased revenues, such as reappraisals or factoring
orders);
(b)  $__________ of the increase will come from natural increases in the value
of the tax base due to (explain cause of new growth, such as new building
activity, annexation, etc.);
(c)  a home valued at $100,000 in the state of Utah which based on last year's
(levy for the basic state-supported school program, levy for the Property Tax
Valuation Agency Fund, or both) paid $____________ in property taxes would pay
the following:
(i)  $__________ if the state of Utah did not budget an increase in property
tax revenue exclusive of new growth; and
(ii)  $__________ under the increased property tax revenues exclusive of new
growth budgeted by the state of Utah."
